dictionaries/ca/index.aff
FLAG long
# Model de conjugació: escollir
SFX 54 Y 108
SFX 54 r r/_v_C_Y ir
SFX 54 r nt/_C ir
SFX 54 r t/_v_Y ir
SFX 54 r da/_Y ir
SFX 54 r ts/_Y ir
SFX 54 r des/_Y ir
SFX 54 ir eixo/_Z ir
SFX 54 ollir ullo/_Z ir
SFX 54 r sc/_Z ir
SFX 54 ir esc/_Z ir
SFX 54 ollir ull/_Z ir
SFX 54 ir eixes/_Z ir
SFX 54 ollir ulls/_Z ir
SFX 54 r xes/_Z ir
SFX 54 ir eix/_Z ir
SFX 54 ollir ull/_Z ir
SFX 54 r x/_Z ir
SFX 54 r m/_Z ir
SFX 54 r u/_Z ir
SFX 54 ir eixen/_Z ir
SFX 54 ollir ullen/_Z ir
SFX 54 r xen/_Z ir
SFX 54 r a/_Z ir
SFX 54 r es/_Z ir
SFX 54 r a/_Z ir
SFX 54 ir íem/_Z ir
SFX 54 ir íeu/_Z ir
SFX 54 r en/_Z ir
SFX 54 ir í/_Z ir
SFX 54 r res/_Z ir
SFX 54 ir í/_Z ir
SFX 54 ir írem/_Z ir
SFX 54 ir íreu/_Z ir
SFX 54 r ren/_Z ir
SFX 54 r ré/_Z ir
SFX 54 r ràs/_Z ir
SFX 54 r rà/_Z ir
SFX 54 r rem/_Z ir
SFX 54 r reu/_Z ir
SFX 54 r ran/_Z ir
SFX 54 r ria/_Z ir
SFX 54 r ries/_Z ir
SFX 54 r ria/_Z ir
SFX 54 r ríem/_Z ir
SFX 54 r ríeu/_Z ir
SFX 54 r rien/_Z ir
SFX 54 ir esca/_Z ir
SFX 54 r sca/_Z ir
SFX 54 ollir ulla/_Z ir
SFX 54 ir esqui/_Z ir
SFX 54 ir eixi/_Z ir
SFX 54 ollir ulli/_Z ir
SFX 54 ir esques/_Z ir
SFX 54 r sques/_Z ir
SFX 54 ollir ulles/_Z ir
SFX 54 ir esquis/_Z ir
SFX 54 ir eixis/_Z ir
SFX 54 ollir ullis/_Z ir
SFX 54 ir esca/_Z ir
SFX 54 r sca/_Z ir
SFX 54 ollir ulla/_Z ir
SFX 54 ir esqui/_Z ir
SFX 54 ir eixi/_Z ir
SFX 54 ollir ulli/_Z ir
SFX 54 r m/_Z ir
SFX 54 r guem/_Z ir
SFX 54 r u/_Z ir
SFX 54 r gueu/_Z ir
SFX 54 ir esquen/_Z ir
SFX 54 r squen/_Z ir
SFX 54 ollir ullen/_Z ir
SFX 54 ir esquin/_Z ir
SFX 54 ir eixin/_Z ir
SFX 54 ollir ullin/_Z ir
SFX 54 ir ís/_Z ir
SFX 54 r ra/_Z ir
SFX 54 r ssis/_Z ir
SFX 54 r res/_Z ir
SFX 54 r sses/_Z ir
SFX 54 ir ís/_Z ir
SFX 54 r ra/_Z ir
SFX 54 ir íssim/_Z ir
SFX 54 ir írem/_Z ir
SFX 54 ir íssem/_Z ir
SFX 54 ir íssiu/_Z ir
SFX 54 ir íreu/_Z ir
SFX 54 ir ísseu/_Z ir
SFX 54 r ssin/_Z ir
SFX 54 r ren/_Z ir
SFX 54 r ssen/_Z ir
SFX 54 ir eix/_C ir
SFX 54 ollir ull/_C ir
SFX 54 r x/_C ir
SFX 54 ir esca/_D ir
SFX 54 r sca/_D ir
SFX 54 ollir ulla/_D ir
SFX 54 ir esqui/_D ir
SFX 54 ir eixi/_D ir
SFX 54 ollir ulli/_D ir
SFX 54 r m/_C ir
SFX 54 r guem/_C ir
SFX 54 r u/_C ir
SFX 54 ir esquen/_C ir
SFX 54 r squen/_C ir
SFX 54 ollir ullen/_C ir
SFX 54 ir esquin/_C ir
SFX 54 ir eixin/_C ir
SFX 54 ollir ullin/_C ir

# Model de conjugació: escopir
SFX 55 Y 70
SFX 55 r r/_v_C_Y ir
SFX 55 r nt/_C ir
SFX 55 r t/_v_Y ir
SFX 55 r da/_Y ir
SFX 55 r ts/_Y ir
SFX 55 r des/_Y ir
SFX 55 opir upo/_Z ir
SFX 55 opir up/_Z ir
SFX 55 opir ups/_Z ir
SFX 55 opir up/_Z ir
SFX 55 r m/_Z ir
SFX 55 r u/_Z ir
SFX 55 opir upen/_Z ir
SFX 55 r a/_Z ir
SFX 55 r es/_Z ir
SFX 55 r a/_Z ir
SFX 55 ir íem/_Z ir
SFX 55 ir íeu/_Z ir
SFX 55 r en/_Z ir
SFX 55 ir í/_Z ir
SFX 55 r res/_Z ir
SFX 55 ir í/_Z ir
SFX 55 ir írem/_Z ir
SFX 55 ir íreu/_Z ir
SFX 55 r ren/_Z ir
SFX 55 r ré/_Z ir
SFX 55 r ràs/_Z ir
SFX 55 r rà/_Z ir
SFX 55 r rem/_Z ir
SFX 55 r reu/_Z ir
SFX 55 r ran/_Z ir
SFX 55 r ria/_Z ir
SFX 55 r ries/_Z ir
SFX 55 r ria/_Z ir
SFX 55 r ríem/_Z ir
SFX 55 r ríeu/_Z ir
SFX 55 r rien/_Z ir
SFX 55 opir upa/_Z ir
SFX 55 opir upi/_Z ir
SFX 55 opir upes/_Z ir
SFX 55 opir upis/_Z ir
SFX 55 opir upa/_Z ir
SFX 55 opir upi/_Z ir
SFX 55 r m/_Z ir
SFX 55 r u/_Z ir
SFX 55 opir upen/_Z ir
SFX 55 opir upin/_Z ir
SFX 55 ir ís/_Z ir
SFX 55 r ra/_Z ir
SFX 55 r ssis/_Z ir
SFX 55 r res/_Z ir
SFX 55 r sses/_Z ir
SFX 55 ir ís/_Z ir
SFX 55 r ra/_Z ir
SFX 55 ir íssim/_Z ir
SFX 55 ir írem/_Z ir
SFX 55 ir íssem/_Z ir
SFX 55 ir íssiu/_Z ir
SFX 55 ir íreu/_Z ir
SFX 55 ir ísseu/_Z ir
SFX 55 r ssin/_Z ir
SFX 55 r ren/_Z ir
SFX 55 r ssen/_Z ir
SFX 55 opir up/_C ir
SFX 55 opir upa/_D ir
SFX 55 opir upi/_D ir
SFX 55 r m/_C ir
SFX 55 r u/_C ir
SFX 55 opir upen/_C ir
SFX 55 opir upin/_C ir

# Model de conjugació: esglaiar
SFX 56 Y 84
SFX 56 r r/_v_C_Y ar
SFX 56 r nt/_C ar
SFX 56 r t/_v_Y ar
SFX 56 r da/_Y ar
SFX 56 r ts/_Y ar
SFX 56 r des/_Y ar
SFX 56 ar o/_Z ar
SFX 56 ar e/_Z ar
SFX 56 ar 0/_Z ar
SFX 56 ar es/_Z ar
SFX 56 r 0/_Z ar
SFX 56 ar em/_Z ar
SFX 56 r m/_Z ar
SFX 56 ar eu/_Z ar
SFX 56 r u/_Z ar
SFX 56 ar en/_Z ar
SFX 56 r va/_Z ar
SFX 56 r ves/_Z ar
SFX 56 r va/_Z ar
SFX 56 ar àvem/_Z ar
SFX 56 ar àveu/_Z ar
SFX 56 r ven/_Z ar
SFX 56 iar í/_Z ar
SFX 56 r res/_Z ar
SFX 56 ar à/_Z ar
SFX 56 ar àrem/_Z ar
SFX 56 ar àreu/_Z ar
SFX 56 r ren/_Z ar
SFX 56 r ré/_Z ar
SFX 56 r ràs/_Z ar
SFX 56 r rà/_Z ar
SFX 56 r rem/_Z ar
SFX 56 r reu/_Z ar
SFX 56 r ran/_Z ar
SFX 56 r ria/_Z ar
SFX 56 r ries/_Z ar
SFX 56 r ria/_Z ar
SFX 56 r ríem/_Z ar
SFX 56 r ríeu/_Z ar
SFX 56 r rien/_Z ar
SFX 56 ar e/_Z ar
SFX 56 iar ï/_Z ar
SFX 56 ar es/_Z ar
SFX 56 iar ïs/_Z ar
SFX 56 ar e/_Z ar
SFX 56 iar ï/_Z ar
SFX 56 ar em/_Z ar
SFX 56 ar eu/_Z ar
SFX 56 ar en/_Z ar
SFX 56 iar ïn/_Z ar
SFX 56 ar és/_Z ar
SFX 56 r ra/_Z ar
SFX 56 ar às/_Z ar
SFX 56 ar essis/_Z ar
SFX 56 r res/_Z ar
SFX 56 r ssis/_Z ar
SFX 56 ar esses/_Z ar
SFX 56 r sses/_Z ar
SFX 56 ar és/_Z ar
SFX 56 r ra/_Z ar
SFX 56 ar às/_Z ar
SFX 56 ar éssim/_Z ar
SFX 56 ar àrem/_Z ar
SFX 56 ar àssim/_Z ar
SFX 56 ar éssem/_Z ar
SFX 56 ar àssem/_Z ar
SFX 56 ar éssiu/_Z ar
SFX 56 ar àreu/_Z ar
SFX 56 ar àssiu/_Z ar
SFX 56 ar ésseu/_Z ar
SFX 56 ar àsseu/_Z ar
SFX 56 ar essin/_Z ar
SFX 56 r ren/_Z ar
SFX 56 r ssin/_Z ar
SFX 56 ar essen/_Z ar
SFX 56 r ssen/_Z ar
SFX 56 r 0/_D ar
SFX 56 ar e/_D ar
SFX 56 iar ï/_D ar
SFX 56 ar em/_C ar
SFX 56 r u/_C ar
SFX 56 ar eu/_C ar
SFX 56 ar en/_C ar
SFX 56 iar ïn/_C ar

# Model de conjugació: estar
SFX 57 Y 75
SFX 57 r r/_v_C_Y ar
SFX 57 r nt/_C ar
SFX 57 r t/_v_Y ar
SFX 57 r da/_Y ar
SFX 57 r ts/_Y ar
SFX 57 r des/_Y ar
SFX 57 ar ic/_Z ar
SFX 57 ar às/_Z ar
SFX 57 ar à/_Z ar
SFX 57 ar em/_Z ar
SFX 57 r m/_Z ar
SFX 57 ar eu/_Z ar
SFX 57 r u/_Z ar
SFX 57 r n/_Z ar
SFX 57 r va/_Z ar
SFX 57 r ves/_Z ar
SFX 57 r va/_Z ar
SFX 57 ar àvem/_Z ar
SFX 57 ar àveu/_Z ar
SFX 57 r ven/_Z ar
SFX 57 ar iguí/_Z ar
SFX 57 ar igueres/_Z ar
SFX 57 ar igué/_Z ar
SFX 57 ar iguérem/_Z ar
SFX 57 ar iguéreu/_Z ar
SFX 57 ar igueren/_Z ar
SFX 57 r ré/_Z ar
SFX 57 r ràs/_Z ar
SFX 57 r rà/_Z ar
SFX 57 r rem/_Z ar
SFX 57 r reu/_Z ar
SFX 57 r ran/_Z ar
SFX 57 r ria/_Z ar
SFX 57 r ries/_Z ar
SFX 57 r ria/_Z ar
SFX 57 r ríem/_Z ar
SFX 57 r ríeu/_Z ar
SFX 57 r rien/_Z ar
SFX 57 ar iga/_Z ar
SFX 57 ar igui/_Z ar
SFX 57 ar igues/_Z ar
SFX 57 ar iguis/_Z ar
SFX 57 ar iga/_Z ar
SFX 57 ar igui/_Z ar
SFX 57 ar iguem/_Z ar
SFX 57 ar igueu/_Z ar
SFX 57 ar iguen/_Z ar
SFX 57 ar iguin/_Z ar
SFX 57 ar igués/_Z ar
SFX 57 ar iguera/_Z ar
SFX 57 ar iguessis/_Z ar
SFX 57 ar igueres/_Z ar
SFX 57 ar iguesses/_Z ar
SFX 57 ar igués/_Z ar
SFX 57 ar iguera/_Z ar
SFX 57 ar iguéssim/_Z ar
SFX 57 ar iguérem/_Z ar
SFX 57 ar iguéssem/_Z ar
SFX 57 ar iguéssiu/_Z ar
SFX 57 ar iguéreu/_Z ar
SFX 57 ar iguésseu/_Z ar
SFX 57 ar iguessin/_Z ar
SFX 57 ar igueren/_Z ar
SFX 57 ar iguessen/_Z ar
SFX 57 ar igues/_C ar
SFX 57 ar à/_C ar
SFX 57 ar iga/_D ar
SFX 57 ar igui/_D ar
SFX 57 ar iguem/_C ar
SFX 57 ar em/_C ar
SFX 57 r u/_C ar
SFX 57 ar eu/_C ar
SFX 57 ar igueu/_C ar
SFX 57 ar iguen/_C ar
SFX 57 ar iguin/_C ar
